Utah statutes.
70A-9a-102.1.   Definitions from other chapters.
(1)  "Control" as provided in Section 70A-7a-106 and the following definitions
in other chapters of this title apply to this chapter:
(a)  "Applicant" Section 70A-5-102.
(b)  "Beneficiary" Section 70A-5-102.
(c)  "Broker" Section 70A-8-101.
(d)  "Certificated security" Section 70A-8-101.
(e)  "Check" Section 70A-3-104.
(f)  "Clearing corporation" Section 70A-8-101.
(g)  "Contract for sale" Section 70A-2-106.
(h)  "Customer" Section 70A-4-104.
(i)  "Entitlement holder" Section 70A-8-101.
(j)  "Financial asset" Section 70A-8-101.
(k)  "Holder in due course" Section 70A-3-302.
(l) (i)  "Issuer" (with respect to a letter of credit or letter-of-credit
right) Section 70A-5-102.
(ii)  "Issuer" (with respect to a security) Section 70A-8-201.
(iii)  "Issuer" (with respect to documents of title) Section 70A-7a-102.
(m)  "Lease" Section 70A-2a-103.
(n)  "Lease agreement" Section 70A-2a-103.
(o)  "Lease contract" Section 70A-2a-103.
(p)  "Leasehold interest" Section 70A-2a-103.
(q)  "Lessee" Section 70A-2a-103.
(r)  "Lessee in ordinary course of business" Section 70A-2a-103.
(s)  "Lessor" Section 70A-2a-103.
(t)  "Lessor's residual interest" Section 70A-2a-103.
(u)  "Letter of credit" Section 70A-5-102.
(v)  "Merchant" Section 70A-2-104.
(w)  "Negotiable instrument" Section 70A-3-104.
(x)  "Nominated person" Section 70A-5-102.
(y)  "Note" Section 70A-3-104.
(z)  "Proceeds of a letter of credit" Section 70A-5-114.
(aa)  "Prove" Section 70A-3-103.
(bb)  "Sale" Section 70A-2-106.
(cc)  "Securities account" Section 70A-8-501.
(dd)  "Securities intermediary" Section 70A-8-101.
(ee)  "Security" Section 70A-8-101.
(ff)  "Security certificate" Section 70A-8-101.
(gg)  "Security entitlement" Section 70A-8-101.
(hh)  "Uncertificated security" Section 70A-8-101.
(2)  Chapter 1a, Uniform Commercial Code - General Provisions, contains
general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation
applicable throughout this chapter.
